North Dakota, session 69, HB1410.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - CRIMES AGAINST CHILDREN.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider studying state laws
relating to criminal conduct against children, child sexual abuse, child physical abuse, child
neglect, and human trafficking of children.
2. The study must include a review of:
a. The use of the term "child sexually abusive material" or other language deemed
appropriate instead of the term "sexual performance" to describe child pornography or
sexual conduct of a minor in chapter 12.1-27.2.
b. State laws relating to the use of artificial intelligence for crimes relating to sexual
performance of a minor or possession of certain prohibited materials.
c. Other laws intended to protect children and facilitate the investigation and prosecution of
crimes involving child victims of sexual abuse, physical abuse, neglect, and trafficking.
3. The legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any
legislation necessary to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative
assembly.

H. B. NO. 1410 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1410.
House Vote: Yeas 85 Nays 3 Absent 6
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State